Utah statutes.
53A-1-906.   Governor to approve federal education agreements.
(1)  Before legally binding the state by executing a federal education
agreement that may cost education entities more than $500,000 annually from
state and local monies to implement, a school official shall submit the
proposed federal education agreement to the governor for the governor's
approval or rejection.
(2)  The governor shall approve or reject each federal education agreement.
(3) (a)  If the governor approves the federal education agreement, the school
official may execute the agreement.
(b)  If the governor rejects the federal education agreement, the school
official may not execute the agreement.
(4)  If a school official executes a federal education agreement without
obtaining the governor's approval under this section, the governor may issue
an executive order declaring the federal education agreement void.
